Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 86. Health Maintenance Organizations.
Sec. 21.86.170.
Powers of insurers and of hospital or medical service corporations.

An insurer licensed in this state, or a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to do business in this state, may, either directly or through a subsidiary or affiliate, organize and operate a health maintenance organization under the provisions of this chapter. Two or more insurance companies, hospitals or medical service corporations, or subsidiaries or affiliates of them, may jointly organize and operate a health maintenance organization. The business of insurance is considered to include providing health care by a health maintenance organization owned or operated by an insurer or subsidiary of an insurer.

An insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may contract with a health maintenance organization to provide insurance or similar protection against the cost of care provided through a health maintenance organization and to provide coverage in the event of the failure of the health maintenance organization to meet its obligations. The enrollees of a health maintenance organization constitute a permissible group under this title. Under a contract authorized by this subsection, the insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may make benefit payments to health maintenance organizations for health care services rendered by providers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.180.
Examinations.

The director shall examine the affairs and transactions of a health maintenance organization in the same manner as prescribed for an insurer in AS

21.06.140

—

21.06.180

.

As often as is reasonably necessary for the protection of the interests of the people of the state, but at least once every three years, the director shall require submission of an independent review of the quality of care provided by a health maintenance organization either directly or indirectly through contract, agreement, or other arrangement for provisions of health care services to enrollees of the health maintenance organization. The review required under this subsection shall be done by a review organization approved by the Department of Health and Social Services and shall be done under regulations adopted by that department. The health maintenance organization shall pay the cost of the review.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.190.
Suspension or revocation of certificate of authority.

After compliance with AS

21.86.200

, the director may suspend or revoke a certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization under this chapter if

the health maintenance organization is operating significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document or in a manner contrary to that described in other information submitted under AS

21.86.010

or

21.86.020

;

the health maintenance organization issues an evidence of coverage, or uses a schedule of charges for health care services, that does not comply with the requirements of AS

21.86.070

;

the health maintenance organization does not provide or arrange for the provision of basic health care services;

the health maintenance organization is not in compliance with state and federal statutes and regulations as required under AS

21.86.010(b)(12)

, or is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care services;

the health maintenance organization is no longer financially responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;

the health maintenance organization has failed to implement a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to participate in matters of policy and operation under AS

21.86.040

;

the health maintenance organization has failed to implement the complaint system required by AS

21.86.100

in a reasonable manner to resolve valid complaints;

the health maintenance organization, or any person on its behalf, has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue, misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive, or unfair manner;

the continued operation of the health maintenance organization would be hazardous to its enrollees;

the health maintenance organization has otherwise failed substantially to comply with this chapter.

If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization may not, during the period of the suspension, enroll additional enrollees except newborn children or other newly acquired dependents of existing enrollees, and may not engage in advertising or solicitation. The director may, by written order, specify limitations in the operation of the organization during the period of suspension as the director finds to be in the best interests of enrollees.

If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance organization is revoked, the organization shall, immediately following the effective date of the order of revocation, proceed to wind up its affairs, and may not conduct further business except that essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization. The organization may not engage in further advertising or solicitation. The director may, by written order, permit continued operation of the organization as the director finds to be in the best interest of enrollees, so that enrollees will be afforded the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing health care coverage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.200.
Administrative procedures.

If the director has reason to believe that grounds for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate of authority exist, the director shall notify the applicant or the health maintenance organization in writing, specifically stating the grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation. A person aggrieved by a decision of the director regarding denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate of authority may request a hearing under AS

21.06.180

. If a hearing is requested, it shall be held under the procedures in AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.220

, except that AS

21.06.190

does not apply in the case of a hearing regarding denial of a certificate.

After a hearing under (a) of this section, or upon the failure of an applicant or health maintenance organization to appear at such a hearing, the director shall make written findings and issue an order, that shall be mailed to the applicant or health maintenance organization and concurrently provided to the commissioner of health and social services. An appeal of the director’s order may be made in the manner provided by AS

21.06.230

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.210.
Rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation.

A rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation of a health maintenance organization is considered to be a rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation of an insurer, and shall be conducted under AS 21.78. The director may apply to the superior court for an order directing the rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation of a health maintenance organization upon one or more of the grounds contained in AS

21.78.040

,

21.78.050

, or

21.78.060

, or if, in the director’s opinion, the continued operation of the organization would be hazardous to either enrollees or to the people of the state.

Enrollees of a health maintenance organization have the same priority in the event of liquidation or rehabilitation as AS 21.78 provides to policyholders of an insurer. A claim made by a health care provider in a liquidation or rehabilitation that pertains to services provided to an enrollee, has the same priority as an enrollee if the provider agrees not to assert the claim against an enrollee and if any payment fully discharges the obligation of the enrollee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.220.
Regulations.

The commissioner of health and social services may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the commissioner’s duties under this chapter.
The director may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the director’s duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

Sec. 21.86.230.
Fees.

A health maintenance organization shall pay fees to the director as provided under AS

21.06.250

.

A health maintenance organization shall pay to the commissioner of health and social services fees, as established in regulations adopted by the commissioner of health and social services, that relate to the regulatory functions performed by that department under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.240.
Taxation.

A health maintenance organization is taxed as provided under AS

21.09.210(b)(1)

, and shall file the report required of an authorized insurer under AS

21.09.210(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.250.
Penalties and enforcement.

Instead of, or in addition to, suspending or revoking a certificate of authority, the director may, in an order issued under AS

21.86.200

, impose an administrative penalty in an amount not less than $1,000 nor more than $25,000 for each violation of an applicable provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

The director may issue an order directing a health maintenance organization or a person representing a health maintenance organization to stop engaging in an act or practice that is in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter. Within five days after service of a stop order under this subsection, the respondent may request, in writing, a hearing on the question of whether the act or practice has occurred in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted by the director. The hearing shall commence within 10 days after the written request for the hearing has been received by the director unless the respondent requests that the hearing take place at a later date and the director agrees to the later hearing date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.260.
Statutory construction and relationship to other law.

Except as provided in AS 21.36, AS 21.42, AS 21.54, AS 21.56, AS 21.79, and in this chapter, this title does not apply to a health maintenance organization that obtains a certificate of authority under this chapter. This subsection does not apply to an insurer licensed under AS 21.09 or a hospital or medical service corporation licensed under AS 21.87 except with respect to its health maintenance organization activities authorized by and regulated under this chapter.

Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance organization that has obtained a certificate of authority or by its licensed agents or authorized employee representatives, may not be construed to violate a law of this state relating to solicitation or advertising by health care professionals.

A health maintenance organization that obtains a certificate of authority under this chapter is not considered to be practicing medicine, and is exempt from a law of this state relating to the practice of medicine. However, this subsection does not exempt a health care provider from a licensing requirement, or from another law of this state regarding providers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 39 SLA 1993; am § 101 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 56 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), added “, AS 21.79,” at the end of the chapter list.

Sec. 21.86.270.
Filings and reports as public documents.

Except for information described in AS

21.86.100(b)(3)

and except for trade secrets, privileged, confidential commercial, or financial information as determined by the director, all applications, filings, and reports required under this chapter, including annual financial statements that are required under AS

21.86.080

, are public documents.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.280.
Confidentiality of medical information. [Repealed, § 53 ch 96 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 21.86.290.
Contract authority for commissioner of health and social services.

In carrying out duties under this chapter, the commissioner of health and social services may contract with qualified persons to make recommendations concerning the determinations required to be made by the commissioner. Recommendations made by a contractor may be accepted in full or in part by the commissioner of health and social services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.300.
Acquisition of control or merger of a health maintenance organization.

A person may not acquire control of the voting securities of a domestic health maintenance organization, if, after the consummation of the transaction, that person would, directly or indirectly, or by conversion or by exercise of any right to acquire, be in control of the health maintenance organization, or enter into an agreement to merge or consolidate with, or otherwise to acquire control of, a health maintenance organization.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a person who at the time the offer, request, or invitation is made or the agreement is entered into, or before the acquisition of the securities if no offer or agreement is involved, has filed with the director and has sent to the health maintenance organization, information required by AS 21.22 and the offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition has been approved by the director. Approval by the director under this subsection is governed by AS 21.22.

In this section,

“acquire control of ” means to make a tender for, make a request or invitation for tenders of, enter into an agreement to exchange securities for, or acquire in the open market or otherwise;

“domestic” means formed under the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.310.
Dual choice.

An employer in this state, whether public or private, that offers its employees a health benefit plan and employs 25 or more employees during any week of the calendar year, and an employee benefit fund in this state that offers its members any form of health benefit, shall make available to its employees or members the option to enroll in at least one health maintenance organization, holding a valid certificate of authority, that provides health care services in the geographic areas in which substantial numbers of the employees or members reside. If employees of the employer are members of a collective bargaining unit, the option of enrollment in a health maintenance organization shall first be submitted to the bargaining representative of the bargaining unit. If the option is approved by the bargaining representative, the option of enrollment shall then be made to each represented employee.

An employer in this state is not required to pay more for employee health benefits as a result of the application of this section than would be required if this section did not apply to the employer. If an employee chooses enrollment in a health maintenance organization, the employer is required to pay, on behalf of that employee, only an amount equal to the lesser of

the amount that would have to be paid to an insurer on behalf of its employees for substantially similar health benefits; or

the health maintenance organization’s charge for coverage that is approved by the director under AS

21.86.070

.

This section does not apply to an employer whose employees or members reside in an area where health care services are not provided by a health maintenance organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.86.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“affiliation period” means a period of time under a contract with a health maintenance organization

that must expire before coverage becomes effective;

during which the health maintenance organization is not required to provide health care services or benefits; and

for which no premium is charged to the participant or beneficiary for coverage during the period;

“agent” means a person who is appointed by a health maintenance organization and who engages in solicitation of membership in the organization; “agent” does not include a person enrolling health maintenance organization members on behalf of an employer, a union, or other organization to whom a master subscriber contract has been issued, or an employee, who is not an independent contractor, of the health maintenance organization;

“basic health care services” means emergency care, inpatient hospital and physician care, and outpatient medical services, but does not include mental health services or services for alcohol or drug abuse;

“beneficiary” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“enrollee” means an individual who is enrolled in a health maintenance organization;

“enrollment date” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“evidence of coverage” means a certificate, agreement, or contract issued to an enrollee, setting out the coverage to which the enrollee is entitled;

“group market” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care services” means services for medical or dental care, or hospitalization, or services incident to the furnishing of that care or hospitalization, and includes services for the purpose of preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness, injury, or physical disability;

“health maintenance organization” means a person that undertakes to provide or arrange for basic health care services to enrollees on a prepaid basis;

“health status factor” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“participant” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

and includes a joint venture;

“preexisting condition exclusion” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“provider” means a physician, hospital, or other person licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to furnish health care services;

“uncovered expenditures” means the costs of health care services that are covered by a health maintenance organization, but for which an enrollee would also be liable if the organization became insolvent;

“waiting period” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1990; am § 102 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (1), (4), (6), (8), (11), (12), and (14) were enacted as (10)-(17), respectively. Renumbered in 1997, at which time former paragraphs (1)-(9) were renumbered as (2), (3), (5), (7), (9), (10), (13), (15), and (16), respectively.